Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-734
Persons not present in demanding state at time of commission of crime; extradition.

The Governor of this state may also surrender, on demand of the Executive Authority of any other state, any person in this state charged in such other state in the manner provided in section 29-731 with committing an act in this state, or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in the state whose Executive Authority is making the demand, and the provisions of sections 29-729 to 29-758 not otherwise inconsistent, shall apply to such cases, even though the accused was not in that state at the time of the commission of the crime, and has not fled therefrom.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 6, p. 560.

A misstatement as to a petitioner's status as a fugitive in the extradition documents did not afford petitioner his right under the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act to have the question of whether he should be extradited from the asylum state properly determined by the governor of that state and, therefore, requires that he be dismissed from custody. Koenig v. Poskochil, 238 Neb. 118, 469 N.W.2d 523 (1991).

One who commits an act in one state intentionally resulting in a crime in another state may now be extradited. State of Kansas v. Holeb, 188 Neb. 319, 196 N.W.2d 387 (1972).